Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 307.2 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A member of a public body may participate in a public
meeting via videoconference or teleconference from the private
residence of the member, and shall not be required to disclose the
HB2209 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

addr ess of the private residence on the meeting notice or agenda,
provided the following conditions are met:
1. The member identifies the location as the "private
residence" on the meeting notice and agenda, without further detail;
2. The videoconference or teleconference technology used allows
the public to see and hear the member during the meeting; and
3. The member's participation from his or her private residence
does not restrict or limit public access to the meeting or the
member's contributions to the meeting.
B. This section does not apply when a public body holds a
meeting entirely or primarily at a member's private residence, or
when two or more members are present at a member's private
residence. In such cases, full disclosure of the meeting location
is required under the existing provisions of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act.
C. For purposes of this section, "private residence" means any
home, apartment, or other personal living space that is not used as
a public or commercial meeting site.
D. Public bodies shall ensure compliance with all other
provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, including transparency,
accessibility, and notice requirements, when implementing this
section.
E. It is the Legislature's intent to balance the principles of
open governance with the privacy and security of individuals
HB2209 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

part icipating in public meetings from private residences. This
section ensures compliance with transparency requirements while
protecting personal addresses from public disclosure.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
02/26/2025 – DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.


















HB2209 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.